Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.385

Marketing campaign.

The department shall create an expanded social marketing campaign using currently available materials and newly created materials as needed. This campaign should be aimed at consumers and warn them of the risks and potential consequences of hiring unregistered contractors or otherwise assisting in the furtherance of the underground economy. The campaign may include: Providing public service announcements and other similar materials, made available in English as well as other languages, to the media and to community groups; providing information on violations and penalties; and encouraging legitimate contractors and the public to report fraud.

[ 2008 c 120 s 12.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—2008 c 120: See notes following RCW 18.27.030.